Utah statutes.
38-1a-103.   Government projects not subject to chapter -- Exception.

Except as provided in Section 38-1a-102, Part 2, State Construction Registry, and Chapter 1b, Government Construction Projects, this chapter does not apply to a government project, as defined in Section 38-1b-102.

